Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-222.01
Insurance; maximum risk; reinsurance; filing information with director.

For the purpose of determining whether any one risk exceeds the limitation imposed by section 44-222, reinsurance shall be in a company acceptable to the Director of Insurance. If requested by the director, the original company writing the risk or policy shall file with the Director of Insurance evidence of such reinsurance listing the name of the reinsurer and such other information pertaining thereto as may be required by the director.

Laws 1959, c. 197, § 2, p. 705;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 69.